Arkansas, session 2025, HB1969.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Graduate Medical Education Expansion Account — Graduate
Medical Education Expansion Program.
(a) There is created within the Arkansas Medicaid Program Trust Fund a
designated account known as the "Graduate Medical Education Expansion
Account".
(b) Moneys in the Graduate Medical Education Expansion Account shall
consist of all moneys collected or received by the Division of Medical
Services from § 26-57-610(b)(6)(B)(ii).
(c) The Graduate Medical Education Expansion Account shall be separate
and distinct from the General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment
Fund and shall be supplementary to the Arkansas Medicaid Program Trust Fund.
*JMB373*
04/01/2025 5:48:35 PM JMB373

HB1969
(d) Moneys in the Graduate Medical Education Expansion Account shall
supplement, but not supplant, funding appropriated to the Graduate Medical
Education Fund under § 19-5-1265.
(e) The Graduate Medical Education Expansion Account shall be exempt
from budgetary cuts, reductions, or eliminations caused by a deficiency of
general revenues.
(f) The moneys in the Graduate Medical Education Expansion Account
shall be used only to make payments to eligible hospital providers for the
direct costs of graduate medical education programs for eligible residency
and fellowship positions added on or after July 1, 2025.
(g) The Graduate Medical Education Expansion Account shall retain
account balances remaining at the end of each year.
(h) The division shall promulgate rules to create and implement the
"Graduate Medical Education Expansion Program" to provide payments to
eligible hospital providers.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-77-1901(3), concerning the definition of
"Medicare Cost Report" relating to the assessment fee on hospitals
participating in the Arkansas Medicaid Program, is amended to read as
follows:
(3) “Medicare Cost Report” means CMS-2552-96, the Cost report
for Electronic Filing of Hospitals as it existed on January 1, 2009 CMS-2552-
10, as existing on January 1, 2025;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 20-77-1901(9) and (10), concerning the
definitions for upper payment limit and upper payment limit gap, are amended
to read as follows:
(9) “Upper payment limit” means the maximum ceiling imposed by
federal regulation on privately owned hospital fee-for-service Medicaid
reimbursement for inpatient services under 42 C.F.R § 447.272 and outpatient
services under 42 C.F.R § 447.321; and
(10)(A) “Upper payment limit gap” means the difference between
the upper payment limit and fee-for-service Medicaid payments not financed
using hospital assessments made to all privately operated hospitals.
(B) The upper payment limit gap shall be calculated
separately for hospital inpatient and fee-for-service outpatient services.
04/01/2025 5:48:35 PM JMB373

HB1969
(C) Medicaid disproportionate share payments shall be
excluded from the calculation of the upper payment limit gap.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77 is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 29 – Hospital Directed Payment Assessment

20-77-2901. Purpose.
The purpose of this subchapter is to:
(1) Maximize reimbursement for hospital services to Medicaid
patients in this state;
(2) Ensure the financial sustainability of healthcare in this
state, including in rural areas; and
(3) Support access and quality of care for residents of this
state.

20-77-2902. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Contract year” means the capitation rating period of
January 1 through December 31 of each year in which a contracted entity
enters into a capitated contract with the Department of Human Services under
the Medicaid Provider-Led Organized Care Act, § 20-77-2701 et seq., or any
other Medicaid managed care programs for which the Department of Human
Services contracts;
(2)(A) “Contracted entity” means an organization or entity that
enters into or will enter into a capitated contract with the Department of
Human Services for the delivery of services under the Medicaid Provider-Led
Organized Care Act, § 20-77-2701 et seq., or any successor Medicaid managed
care program, that will assume financial risk, operational accountability,
and statewide or regional functionality in managing comprehensive health
outcomes of Medicaid beneficiaries.
(B) “Contracted entity” includes without limitation an
accountable care organization, a risk-based provider organization, a
provider-led entity, a commercial plan, a dental benefit manager, a managed
care organization, or any other entity as determined by the Department of
Human Services;
04/01/2025 5:48:35 PM JMB373

HB1969
(3) “Directed payment” means payment arrangements under 42
C.F.R. § 438.6(c), as existing on January 1, 2025, that permit states to
direct specific payments made by contracted entities to providers under
certain circumstances and can assist states in furthering the goals and
priorities of Medicaid managed care programs;
(4) “Directed payment preprint” means the materials required
under 42 C.F.R. § 438.6(c), as existing on January 1, 2025, to be submitted
to the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services for review and written
approval prior to implementing directed payments;
(5) “Hospital” means a healthcare facility licensed as a
hospital by the Department of Health under § 20-9-213;
(6)(A) “Managed care gap” means the difference between:
(i) The maximum amount that can be paid for hospital
inpatient and outpatient services to Medicaid managed care enrollees; and
(ii) The total amount of Medicaid managed care
payments for hospital inpatient and outpatient services.
(B) In calculating the managed care gap, the Department of
Human Services shall use whatever methodology and data source permitted under
42 C.F.R. § 438.6(c)(2)(ii) and (iii), as existing on January 1, 2025, that
would result in the highest payment rate for hospital services under § 20-77-
2910;
(7) “Managed care program” means a Medicaid managed care
delivery system operated under a contract between the Department of Human
Services and a contracted entity as authorized under sections 1915(a),
1915(b), 1932(a), or 1115(a) of the Social Security Act;
(8) “Medicare cost report” means CMS-2552-10, the Hospital and
Hospital Health Care Complex Cost Report, or the cost report for electronic
filing of hospitals;
(9) “Pass-through payment” means a managed care program payment
arrangement implemented in accordance with 42 C.F.R. § 438.6(d)(6), as
existing on January 1, 2025, for services transitioned from a fee-for-service
program to a managed care program on or after January 1, 2026, for the
purposes of ensuring that payments to individual hospitals are not adversely
affected by transition of services to managed care programs; and
(10) “State government-owned hospital” means a hospital that is
owned by an agency or unit of state government, including the University of
04/01/2025 5:48:35 PM JMB373

HB1969
Arkansas for Medical Sciences.

20-77-2903. Hospital managed care reimbursement.
On and after January 1, 2026, the Division of Medical Services of the
Department of Human Services shall ensure that all hospital services to
Medicaid managed care program enrollees be reimbursed at the highest rate
permitted by federal law through the implementation of directed payments
programs and other mechanisms authorized by this subchapter.

20-77-2904. Hospital directed payment assessment.
(a) There is created the hospital directed payment assessment, which
shall be a directed payment assessment imposed on each hospital, except those
exempted by the Division of Medical Services under the authority in § 20-77-
2907, for each contract year in accordance with rules adopted by the
division.
(b) The hospital directed payment assessment rates under subsection
(a) of this section shall be determined annually to generate the non-federal
portion of the managed care gap plus the annual fee under § 20-77-
2906(f)(1)(C), but in no case at rates that would cause the combined
assessment proceeds under this subchapter and § 20-77-1902 to exceed the
indirect guarantee threshold set forth in 42 C.F.R. § 433.68(f)(3)(i), as
existing on January 1, 2025.
(c)(1) The assessment basis under this section shall be adopted by
rule and calculated using the data from each hospital’s most recent audited
Medicare cost report available at the time of the calculation, including data
for hospitals assessed under this section and hospitals exempted from the
assessment under § 20-77-2907.
(2) The inpatient and outpatient portions of assessment basis
under this subsection shall be determined through methods adopted by rule.
(d) This subchapter does not authorize a unit of county or local
government to license for revenue or impose a tax or assessment upon
hospitals or a tax or assessment measured by the income or earnings of a
hospital.

20-77-2905. Hospital directed payment assessment administration.
(a) The Director of the Division of Medical Services shall administer
04/01/2025 5:48:35 PM JMB373

HB1969
the hospital directed payment assessment created in this subchapter.
(b)(1) The Division of Medical Services shall adopt rules to implement
this subchapter.
(2) The rules adopted under this section shall specify any
exceptions to or exemptions from the hospital directed payment assessment in
accordance with authorities in § 20-77-2907.
(3) The rules adopted under this section shall include any
necessary forms for:
(A) Proper imposition and collection of the hospital
directed payment assessment imposed under § 20-77-2904;
(B) Enforcement of this subchapter, including without
limitation letters of caution or sanctions; and
(C) Reporting of inpatient and outpatient portions of the
assessment basis.
(c) To the extent practicable, the division shall administer and
enforce this subchapter and collect the assessments, interest, and penalty
assessments imposed under this subchapter using procedures generally employed
in the administration of the division’s other powers, duties, and functions.

20-77-2906. Hospital Directed Payment Assessment Account.
(a)(1) There is created within the Arkansas Medicaid Program Trust
Fund a designated account known as the "Hospital Directed Payment Assessment
Account".
(2) The hospital directed payment assessments imposed under §
20-77-2904 shall be deposited into the Hospital Directed Payment Assessment
Account.
(b) Moneys in the Hospital Directed Payment Assessment Account shall
consist of:
(1) All moneys collected or received by the Division of Medical
Services from hospital directed payment program assessments under § 20-77-
2904; and
(2) Any interest or penalties levied in conjunction with the
administration of this subchapter.
(c) The Hospital Directed Payment Assessment Account shall be separate
and distinct from the General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment
Fund and shall be supplementary to the Arkansas Medicaid Program Trust Fund.
04/01/2025 5:48:35 PM JMB373

HB1969
(d) Moneys in the Hospital Directed Payment Assessment Account shall
not be used to:
(1) Replace any general revenues appropriated and funded by the
General Assembly or other revenues used to support Medicaid, including
appropriations for cost settlements and other payments that may be reduced or
eliminated as a result of any transition of populations or services to
Medicaid managed care;
(2) Reduce hospital payment rates under the Arkansas Medicaid
Program, including negotiated rates paid by contracted entities, below the
hospital rates in effect on the date on the effective date of this
subchapter; or
(3)(A) Fund directed payments for state government-owned
hospitals.
(B) A state government-owned hospital may separately fund
directed payments through intergovernmental transfers.
(e) The Hospital Directed Payment Assessment Account shall be exempt
from budgetary cuts, reductions, or eliminations caused by a deficiency of
general revenues.
(f)(1) Except as necessary to reimburse any funds borrowed to
supplement funds in the Hospital Directed Payment Assessment Account, the
moneys in the Hospital Directed Payment Assessment Account shall be used only
to:
(A) Make inpatient and outpatient hospital directed
payments under § 20-77-2910;
(B) Reimburse moneys collected by the division from
hospitals through error or mistake or under this subchapter;
(C) Pay an annual fee to the division in the amount of
three and three-quarters percent (3.75%) of the assessments collected from
hospitals under § 20-77-2904 each contract year; or
(D) Make hospital pass-through payments under § 20-77-
2911, in amounts deemed necessary by the division, to ensure Medicaid
payments to individual hospitals are not adversely impacted by transitioning
delivery of services from fee-for-service programs to managed care programs
on and after January 1, 2026.
(2)(A) The Hospital Directed Payment Assessment Account shall
retain account balances remaining at the end of each contract year.
04/01/2025 5:48:35 PM JMB373

HB1969
(B) At the end of each contract year, any positive balance
remaining in the Hospital Directed Payment Assessment Account shall be
factored into the calculation of the new assessment rate by reducing the
amount of hospital directed payment assessment funds that must be generated
during the subsequent contract year.
(3) A hospital shall not be guaranteed that its inpatient and
outpatient hospital directed payment access payments will equal or exceed the
amount of its hospital directed payment assessment.

20-77-2907. Exemptions.
(a) The Division of Medical Services may establish hospital assessment
exemptions or varied assessment rates as needed to effectuate the purpose of
the hospital directed payment assessment as established in this subchapter.
(b) In addition to any exemptions established in accordance with
subsection (a) of this section, the division shall exempt from the hospital
directed payment assessment under § 20-77-2904 any state government-owned
hospital.

20-77-2908. Quarterly notice and collection.
(a)(1) The annual hospital directed payment assessment imposed under §
20-77-2904 shall be due and payable on a quarterly basis.
(2) However, an installment payment of a hospital directed
payment assessment imposed by § 20-77-2904 shall not be due and payable
until:
(A) The Division of Medical Services issues the written
notice required by § 20-77-2909 stating that the payment methodologies to
hospitals required under § 20-77-2910 have been approved by the Centers for
Medicare & Medicaid Services and the waiver under 42 C.F.R. § 433.68 for the
hospital directed payment assessment imposed by § 20-77-2904, if necessary,
has been granted by the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services;
(B) The thirty-day verification period required by § 20-
77-2909(b) has expired; and
(C) The division has made all quarterly installments of
inpatient and outpatient hospital directed payment access payments to
contracted entities that were otherwise due under § 20-77-2910 consistent
with the effective date of the approved directed payment preprint and waiver.
04/01/2025 5:48:35 PM JMB373

HB1969
(3) After the initial installment has been paid under this
section, each subsequent quarterly installment payment of the hospital
directed payment assessment imposed by § 20-77-2904 shall be due and payable
within ten (10) business days after the hospital has received its inpatient
and outpatient hospital directed payment access payments due under § 20-77-
2910 for the applicable quarter.
(b) The payment by the hospital of the hospital directed payment
assessment created in this subchapter shall be reported as an allowable cost
for Medicaid reimbursement purposes.
(c)(1) If a hospital fails to timely pay the full amount of a
quarterly hospital directed payment assessment, the division may add to the
assessment:
(A) A penalty assessment equal to five percent (5%) of the
quarterly amount not paid on or before the due date; and
(B) On the last day of each quarter after the due date
until the assessed amount and the penalty imposed under subsection (c)(1)(A)
of this section are paid in full, an additional five percent (5%) penalty
assessment on any unpaid quarterly and unpaid penalty assessment amounts.
(2) Payments shall be credited first to unpaid quarterly
amounts, rather than to penalty or interest amounts, beginning with the most
delinquent installment.
(3) If the division is unable to recoup from Medicaid payments
the full amount of any unpaid hospital directed payment assessment or penalty
assessment, or both, the division may file suit in a court of competent
jurisdiction to collect up to double the amount due, the division’s costs
related to the suit, and reasonable attorney’s fees.

20-77-2909. Notice of hospital directed payment assessment.
(a)(1) The Division of Medical Services shall send a notice of
hospital directed payment assessment to each hospital informing the hospital
of the hospital directed payment assessment rate, the hospital’s assessment
basis calculation, and the estimated hospital directed payment assessment
amount owed by the hospital for the applicable contract year.
(2) Except as set forth in subdivision (a)(3) of this section,
the annual notices of hospital directed payment assessment under subdivision
(a)(1) of this section shall be sent at least forty-five (45) days before the
04/01/2025 5:48:35 PM JMB373

HB1969
due date for the first quarterly hospital directed payment assessment payment
of each contract year.
(3) The first notice of the hospital directed payment assessment
under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be sent within fifteen (15)
days after receipt by the division of notification from the Centers for
Medicare & Medicaid Services for the payments required under § 20-77-2910
and, if necessary, the waiver granted under 42 C.F.R. § 433.68 have been
approved.
(b) The hospital shall have thirty (30) days from the date of its
receipt of a notice of the hospital directed payment assessment under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section to review and verify the hospital directed
payment assessment rate, the hospital’s assessment basis calculation, and the
hospital directed payment assessment amount.
(c)(1) If a hospital provider operates, conducts, or maintains more
than one (1) hospital in the state, the hospital provider shall pay the
hospital directed payment assessment rate for each hospital separately.
(2) However, if the hospital provider under subdivision (c)(1)
of this section operates more than one (1) hospital under one (1) Medicaid
provider number, the hospital provider may pay the hospital directed payment
assessment for the hospitals in the aggregate.
(d)(1) For a hospital subject to the hospital directed payment
assessment under § 20-77-2904 that ceases to conduct hospital operations or
maintain its state license or did not conduct hospital operations throughout
a contract year, the hospital directed payment assessment for the contract
year in which the cessation occurs shall be adjudicated by multiplying the
annual hospital directed payment assessment computed under § 20-77-2904 by a
fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days during the year that
the hospital operated and the denominator of which is three hundred sixty-
five (365).
(2)(A) Immediately upon ceasing to operate, the hospital shall
pay the adjusted hospital directed payment assessment for that contract year
to the extent not previously paid.
(B) The hospital also shall receive payments under § 20-
77-2910 for the contract year in which the cessation occurs, which shall be
adjusted by the same fraction as its annual hospital directed payment
assessment.
04/01/2025 5:48:35 PM JMB373

HB1969
(e) A hospital subject to a hospital directed payment assessment under
this subchapter that has not been previously licensed as a hospital in
Arkansas and that commences hospital operations during a contract year shall
pay the required hospital directed payment assessment computed under § 20-77-
2904 and shall be eligible for hospital directed payment access payments
under § 20-77-2910 on the date specified in rules promulgated by the division
under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(f) A hospital that is exempt from payment of the hospital directed
payment assessment under § 20-77-2907 at the beginning of a contract year but
during the contract year experiences a change in status so that it becomes
subject to a hospital directed payment assessment shall pay the required
hospital directed payment assessment computed under § 20-77-2904 and shall be
eligible for hospital directed payment access payments under § 20-77-2910 on
the date specified in rules promulgated by the division.
(g) A hospital that is subject to payment of the hospital directed
payment assessment computed under § 20-77-2904 at the beginning of a contract
year but during the contract year experiences a change in status so that it
becomes exempted from payment under § 20-77-2907 shall be relieved of its
obligation to pay the hospital directed payment assessment and shall become
ineligible for hospital directed payment access payments under § 20-77-2910
on the date specified in rules promulgated by the division.

20-77-2910. Hospital directed payment access payments.
(a) To preserve and improve access to quality hospital services, for
hospital inpatient and outpatient services rendered on or after January 1,
2026, the Division of Medical Services shall make hospital directed payment
access payments as set forth in this section.
(b) The division shall calculate the total hospital directed payment
access payment amount as the lesser of:
(1) The amount equal to the managed care gap for inpatient and
outpatient hospital services; or
(2) The amount that can be financed with a level of non-federal
funds generated through hospital directed payment assessments imposed under §
20-77-2904 that causes the combined assessment proceeds under § 20-77-1902
and § 20-77-2904 to equal the indirect guarantee threshold set forth in 42
C.F.R. § 433.68(f)(3)(i), as existing on January 1, 2025.
04/01/2025 5:48:35 PM JMB373

HB1969
(c)(1) All hospitals shall be eligible for inpatient and outpatient
hospital directed payment access payments through contracted entities each
contract year as set forth in this subsection other than state government-
owned hospitals.
(2)(A) A portion of the hospital directed payment access payment
amount, not to exceed the managed care gap for inpatient services, shall be
designated as the inpatient hospital directed payment access payment pool.
(B) Inpatient hospital directed payment access payments
shall be paid as a uniform percentage rate increase or uniform add-on to base
Medicaid managed care reimbursement to eligible hospitals.
(3)(A) A portion of the hospital directed payment access payment
amount, not to exceed the managed care gap for outpatient hospital services,
shall be designated as the outpatient hospital directed payment access
payment pool.
(B) Outpatient hospital directed payment access payments
shall be paid as a uniform percentage rate increase or uniform add-on to base
Medicaid managed care reimbursement to eligible hospitals.
(4)(A) The hospital directed payment access payment shall be
administered through a separate payment term and lump-sum payments that are
paid no later than thirty (30) days after the end of each quarter for which
the lump-sum payment is attributable, provided that the Centers for Medicare
& Medicaid Services permit the use of this payment mechanism.
(B)(i) In the event that the Centers for Medicare &
Medicaid Services does not permit use of a separate payment term and lump-sum
payments under subdivision (c)(4)(A) of this section, the division shall
include directed payments in capitation rates and require contracted entities
to make add-on payments in hospital claims.
(ii) The division shall require contracted entities
to clearly delineate for hospitals the portion of reimbursement attributable
to directed payments from the portion of reimbursement paid at negotiated
rates.
(d) A hospital directed payment access payment shall not be used to
offset any other payment by contracted entities for hospital inpatient or
outpatient services to Medicaid managed care beneficiaries, including without
limitation any fee-for-service, per diem, private hospital inpatient
adjustment, Medicaid managed care, or cost-settlement payment.
04/01/2025 5:48:35 PM JMB373

HB1969

20-77-2911. Managed Care Pass-Through Payment Pool Account.
(a) There is created within the Arkansas Medicaid Program Trust Fund a
designated account known as the "Managed Care Pass-Through Payment Pool
Account".
(b) Moneys in the Managed Care Pass-Through Payment Pool Account shall
consist of all moneys collected or received by the Division of Medical
Services under § 20-77-2906(f)(1)(D).
(c) The Managed Care Pass-Through Payment Pool Account shall be
separate and distinct from the General Revenue Fund Account of the State
Apportionment Fund and shall be supplementary to the Arkansas Medicaid
Program Trust Fund.
(d) Moneys in the Managed Care Pass-Through Payment Pool Account shall
not be used to:
(1) Replace any general revenues appropriated and funded by the
General Assembly or other revenues used to support Medicaid, including
appropriations for cost settlements and other payments that may be reduced or
eliminated as a result of any transition of populations or services to
managed care;
(2) Reduce provider payment rates under the Arkansas Medicaid
Program, including negotiated rates paid by contracted entities, below the
provider payment rates in effect on the effective date of this subchapter; or
(3)(A) Fund managed care pass-through payments for state
government-owned hospitals.
(B) A state government-owned hospital may separately fund
managed care pass-through payments through intergovernmental transfers.
(e) The Managed Care Pass-Through Payment Pool Account shall be exempt
from budgetary cuts, reductions, or eliminations caused by a deficiency of
general revenues or special revenues allocated for Medicaid.
(f)(1) Except as necessary to reimburse any funds borrowed to
supplement funds in the Hospital Directed Payment Assessment Account, the
moneys in the Managed Care Pass-Through Payment Pool Account shall be used
only to:
(A) Make pass-through payments to individual hospitals, as
deemed necessary by the Department of Human Services, to ensure payments to
individual hospitals are not adversely impacted by the transition of any
04/01/2025 5:48:35 PM JMB373

HB1969
services from fee-for-service programs to managed care programs, on and after
January 1, 2026; or
(B) Reimburse moneys collected by the division from
hospitals through error or mistake under this subchapter.
(2) The Managed Care Pass-Through Payment Pool Account shall
retain all account balances at the end of each contract year.

20-77-2912. Managed Care Provider Incentive Pool Account.
(a) There is created within the Arkansas Medicaid Program Trust Fund a
designated account known as the "Managed Care Provider Incentive Pool
Account".
(b) Moneys in the Managed Care Provider Incentive Pool Account shall
consist of all moneys collected or received by the Division of Medical
Services from § 26-57-610(b)(6)(B)(i).
(c) The Managed Care Provider Incentive Pool Account shall be separate
and distinct from the General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment
Fund and shall be supplementary to the Arkansas Medicaid Program Trust Fund.
(d) Moneys in the Managed Care Provider Incentive Pool Account shall
not be used to:
(1) Replace any general revenues appropriated and funded by the
General Assembly or other revenues used to support Medicaid, including
appropriations for cost settlements and other payments that may be reduced or
eliminated as a result of any transition of populations or services to
managed care;
(2) Reduce provider payment rates under the Arkansas Medicaid
Program, including negotiated rates paid by contracted entities, below the
provider payment rates in effect on the effective date of this subchapter; or
(3)(A) Fund managed care provider incentive pool payments for
state government-owned hospitals.
(B) A state government-owned hospital may separately fund
managed care provider incentive pool payments through intergovernmental
transfers.
(e) The Managed Care Provider Incentive Pool Account shall be exempt
from budgetary cuts, reductions, or eliminations caused by a deficiency of
general revenues.
(f)(1) Except as necessary to reimburse any funds borrowed to
04/01/2025 5:48:35 PM JMB373

HB1969
supplement funds in the Hospital Directed Payment Assessment Account, the
moneys in the Managed Care Provider Incentive Pool Account shall be used only
to:
(A) Make incentive payments to Medicaid providers to
improve access and quality of care under § 20-77-2914; or
(B) Reimburse moneys collected by the division from
hospitals through error or mistake or under this subchapter.
(2) The Managed Care Provider Incentive Pool Account shall
retain account balances remaining at the end of each contract year.

20-77-2913. Medicaid Sustainability Advisory Committee — Medicaid
Quality Advisory Committee.
(a) To ensure providers have a voice in the direction and operation of
the Medicaid programs contemplated by this subchapter, the Division of
Medical Services shall establish a Medicaid Sustainability Advisory Committee
and the Medicaid Quality Advisory Committee.
(b)(1) The Medicaid Sustainability Advisory Committee shall be
comprised of:
(A) Two (2) members appointed by the division;
(B) Four (4) members appointed by hospitals and integrated
health systems;
(C) One (1) member appointed by the University of Arkansas
for Medical Sciences;
(D) One (1) member appointed by the Arkansas Hospital
Association, Inc.; and
(E) Two (2) other representatives of the healthcare
provider community.
(2) The Medicaid Sustainability Advisory Committee shall make
recommendations to the division and the General Assembly regarding any
proposed legislative, programmatic, regulatory, or policy change that impacts
hospitals’ participation in directed payments, pass-through payments,
hospital assessments, graduate medical education, provider incentives, and
managed care programs.
(c)(1) The Medicaid Quality Advisory Committee shall be comprised of:
(A) Two (2) members appointed by the division;
(B) Four (4) members appointed by hospitals and integrated
04/01/2025 5:48:35 PM JMB373

HB1969
health systems;
(C) One (1) member appointed by University of Arkansas for
Medical Sciences; and
(D) Two (2) other representatives of the healthcare
provider community.
(2) The Medicaid Quality Advisory Committee shall review quality
improvement needs and recommend initiatives supported by the Managed Care
Provider Incentive Program.

20-77-2914. Managed Care Provider Incentive Program.
(a)(1) The Division of Medical Services shall promulgate rules to
create and implement the "Managed Care Provider Incentive Program" to support
healthcare quality assurance and access improvement initiatives.
(2) For state fiscal years ending on or before June 30, 2030,
the Managed Care Provider Incentive Program shall be dedicated to initiatives
that support improved access to maternal health and primary care providers.
(3) For state fiscal years starting on or after July 1, 2030,
the Managed Care Provider Incentive Program shall be dedicated to other
initiatives approved by a majority vote of the Medicaid Sustainability
Advisory Committee.
(b) For state fiscal years starting on or after July 1, 2030, all
initiatives supported by the Managed Care Provider Incentive Program shall be
approved by a majority vote of the members of the Medicaid Quality Advisory
Committee.

20-77-2915. Processing directed payments through contracted entities.
The Division of Medical Services may process directed payments through
contracted entities only if:
(1) The division provides each contracted entity with a detailed
list of hospital directed payment access payments, specifying the amounts to
be paid to each eligible hospital as required by this subchapter;
(2) Each contracted entity disburses the hospital directed
payment access payments to eligible hospitals within five (5) business days
of receiving a supplemental capitation payment;
(3) Contracted entities are prohibited from withholding or
delaying the payment of a hospital directed payment access payment for any
04/01/2025 5:48:35 PM JMB373

HB1969
reason; and
(4) The division exercises administrative discretion to ensure
that each eligible hospital receives the full payment of all hospital
directed payment access payments, utilizing appropriate payment mechanisms as
necessary.

20-77-2916. Effectiveness and cessation.
(a) The hospital directed payment assessment imposed under § 20-77-
2904 shall cease to be imposed, the Medicaid hospital directed payment access
payments made under § 20-77-2910 shall cease to be paid, and any moneys
remaining in the Hospital Directed Payment Assessment Account and the Managed
Care Provider Incentive Pool Account that were derived from the hospital
directed payment assessment imposed under § 20-77-2904 shall be refunded to
hospitals in proportion to the amounts paid by the hospitals if the inpatient
or outpatient hospital directed payment access payments required under § 20-
77-2910 are not approved or the hospital directed payments assessments
imposed under § 20-77-2904 are not eligible for federal matching funds under
Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., or Title XXI
of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1397aa et seq.
(b)(1) The hospital directed payment assessment imposed under § 20-77-
2904 shall cease to be imposed and the hospital directed payment access
payments under § 20-77-2910 shall cease to be paid if the assessment is
determined to be impermissible under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42
U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.
(2) Moneys in the Hospital Directed Payment Assessment Account
in the Arkansas Medicaid Program Trust Fund derived from assessments imposed
before the determination described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section
shall be disbursed under § 20-77-2910 to the extent federal matching is not
reduced due to the impermissibility of the assessments, and any remaining
moneys shall be refunded to hospitals in proportion to the amounts paid by
the hospitals.

20-77-2917. Directed payment preprint.
(a)(1) The Division of Medical Services shall seek approval of the
hospital directed payment access payments under § 20-77-2910 from the Centers
for Medicare & Medicaid Services for each contract year by submitting a
04/01/2025 5:48:35 PM JMB373

HB1969
directed payment preprint and any information required under 42 C.F.R.§
438.6(c) to the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services at least ninety (90)
days before the start of each contract year.
(2) The division shall prepare the annual 42 C.F.R. § 438.6(c)
directed payment preprint or amendment in collaboration with the Arkansas
Hospital Association, Inc.
(3) To the extent the directed payment preprint or amendment
that the division plans to submit to the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid
Services for approval would result in a reduction to the payment rate to
eligible hospitals as compared to the federally approved rates for the prior
year or directed payment preprint submission, the division shall provide the
Medicaid Sustainability Advisory Committee at least thirty (30) days to
review and propose an alternative methodology.
(4) The division shall use the methodology proposed by the
Medicaid Sustainability Advisory Committee for the directed payment preprint
submission unless the division obtains written confirmation from the Centers
for Medicare & Medicaid Services that the proposed alternative methodology
cannot be approved as proposed and that no modifications are possible to
obtain approval for the alternative methodology.
(5) The division shall make the written confirmation available
to the Medicaid Sustainability Advisory Committee.
(b)(1) The directed payment preprint shall not condition hospital
eligibility for directed payments upon hospital compliance with initiatives
and policies that are not related to quality measures identified in the
Medicaid managed care quality strategy or otherwise require hospitals to
spend a portion of their directed payment or other revenues as prescribed by
the division to remain eligible for directed payments.
(2) All inpatient and outpatient hospital services paid by
contracted entities for services shall be eligible for the directed payment,
regardless of whether the hospital is in-network with the contracted entity.
(c) If the directed payment preprint is not approved by the Centers
for Medicare & Medicaid Services, the division shall:
(1) Not implement the hospital directed payment assessment
imposed under § 20-77-2904; and
(2) Return any hospital directed payment assessment fees to the
hospitals that paid the fees if hospital directed payment assessment fees
04/01/2025 5:48:35 PM JMB373

HB1969
have been collected.

20-77-2918. Continuation of hospital access payments.
The Department of Human Services shall continue to pay the maximum
upper payment limit hospital access payments for inpatient and outpatient
hospital services delivered to fee-for-service Medicaid populations to the
full extent authorized under § 20-77-1901 et seq., until Medicaid populations
or program services are transferred from a fee-for-service to a managed care
delivery model.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 26-57-610(b), concerning the disposition of
insurance premium taxes, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read
as follows:
(6) The taxes based on premiums collected under the Arkansas
Medicaid Program, other than the premiums collected for coverage under
subdivisions (b)(2) and (b)(5) of this section at the levels of coverage that
existed as of January 1, 2025, shall be:
(A) At the time of deposit, separately certified by the
commissioner to the Treasurer of State for classification and distribution
under this section; and
(B) Transferred in amounts equal to:
(i) Fifty percent (50%) of the taxes for deposit
into the Managed Care Provider Incentive Pool Account under § 20-77-2912;
(ii) Ten percent (10%) of the taxes for deposit into
the Graduate Medical Education Expansion Account set forth in § 20-77-154;
and
(iii) Forty percent (40%) of the taxes for deposit
into the General Revenue Fund Account to be used in a manner authorized by
the General Assembly for the purposes set forth in the Revenue Stabilization
Law, § 19-5-101 et seq.

SECTION 6. DO NOT CODIFY. Contingent effective date.
Sections 1, 4, and 5 of this act are effective on and after the date
that the Secretary of the Department of Human Services:
(1) Determines that the:
(1) Fee-for-service Medicaid populations are added as a
04/01/2025 5:48:35 PM JMB373

HB1969
covered populations to be served by a risk-based provider organization under
the Medicaid Provider-Led Organized Care Act, § 20-77-2701 et seq.;
(2) Fee-for-service Medicaid populations are transitioned
to a Medicaid managed care program approved by the Centers for Medicare &
Medicaid Services;
(3) Individuals in the eligibility category created by
section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. §
1396a, as existing on January 1, 2025, are transitioned to a Medicaid managed
care program approved by the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services; or
(4) Individuals in the eligibility category created by
section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. §
1396a, as existing on January 1, 2025, are transitioned to a risk-based
provider organization under the Medicaid Provider-Led Organized Care Act, §
20-77-2701 et seq.; and
(2) Notifies the Legislative Council and the Director of the
Bureau of Legislative Research that one (1) of the contingencies listed in
subdivision (1) of this section has occurred.



















04/01/2025 5:48:35 PM JMB373